Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 2. Administration

§ 19-2-201.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-9-101

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-2-202.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-9-102

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-2-203.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-7-103

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-2-204.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-7-104

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-2-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 163, § 20, related to the composition of the state military board.